apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="call/ar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aríamos</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aríais</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arías</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arían</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aremos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aré</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aréis</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arás</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arán</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ará</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>áremos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>areis</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ares</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aren</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ando</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándo</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabiéndo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amos</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asteis</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aste</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aron</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ó</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><p><l>os</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabed"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>á</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabé"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ád</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabéd"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__saber"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ár</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabér"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ábamos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aba</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abais</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abas</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aban</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aba</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>áramos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ásemos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ase</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arais</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aseis</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aras</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ases</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aran</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asen</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ase</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adas</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ada</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ados</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ado</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amos</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>áis</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emos</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éis</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="calar"><i>cal</i><par n="call/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="callar"><i>call</i><par n="call/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="callarse"><i>call</i><par n="call/ar__vblex"/><p><l>se</l><r><g>se</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="se callar"><p><l>se<b/></l>                     <r><g>se<b/></g></r></p><i>call</i><par n="call/ar__vblex"/></e>
